District of Columbia statutes.
3-1101

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commission” means the District of Columbia Residential, Commercial, and Institutional Structures Fire Protection Study Commission established by § 3-1102.

(2)

“Committee” means the Interdepartmental Advisory Committee established by § 3-1107.

(3)

“Council” means Council of the District of Columbia.

(4)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-183, § 2, 32 DCR 841

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3101.

Editor's Notes

The reference in paragraph (2) to “§ 3-1107” appeared in D.C. Law 5-183 as “§ 2-3106 [1981 Ed.].” The reference should have been to 2-3107 [1981 Ed.], given the sense of the text. Section 2-3107 was recodified as § 3-1107 in the 2001 Edition.